Maine, session 132, LD1781.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §2903, sub-§4, ¶E, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 738, §4, is
amended to read:
E. Brought into this State in the fuel tanks of an aircraft; or
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §2903, sub-§4, ¶F, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 738, §4, is
amended to read:
F. On which the collection of the tax imposed by this section is precluded by federal
law or regulation.; or
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §2903, sub-§4, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. That does not contain any ethanol and is purchased for use by vehicles that are used
exclusively off-road.
Sec. 4. Documentation needed for exemption for ethanol-free fuel
purchased for off-road use. The State Tax Assessor shall adopt rules to determine the
documentation needed to implement the exemption from the Gasoline Tax Act provided in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 2903, subsection 4, paragraph G for a person
eligible for the exemption. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical
rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.